Washington statutes.
RCW 11.02.001

Section headings in Title 11 RCW not part of law.

Section headings, as found in Title 11 RCW, do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 1985 c 30 s 3. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 179.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.